Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4085.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [41A.115] BIOFUEL SALES VOLUME INCENTIVE PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin Beginning January 1, 2028, the commissioner of agriculture must establish and administer a biofuel sales volume incentive program to provide financial incentives to retail gasoline stations for sales of eligible biofuel blends occurring during the previous calendar year. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture; new text end new text begin (2) "eligible biofuel blend" means a blend of gasoline and ethanol that contains 11 to 15 percent denatured ethanol by volume; and new text end new text begin (3) "retail gasoline station" means a retail business location that sells gasoline to end users from fuel dispensers for use in motor vehicles. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Incentive payments. new text end new text begin The commissioner must provide incentive payments of five cents per gallon of eligible biofuel blend sold at a retail gasoline station eligible under subdivision 4, not to exceed $50,000 per year. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Eligibility. new text end new text begin A retail gasoline station is eligible for incentive payments if the retail gasoline station: new text end new text begin (1) is located in Minnesota; new text end new text begin (2) is not a fleet operator; new text end new text begin (3) is operating and dispensing eligible biofuel blend at the retail gasoline station at the time of application; new text end new text begin (4) has not sold eligible biofuel blend before January 1, 2028; new text end new text begin (5) submits monthly reports as required under section 239.791, subdivision 8; and new text end new text begin (6) has not received money under the AGRI Biofuels Infrastructure Grant Program. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin A retail gasoline station must apply for incentive payments in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner and must include: new text end new text begin (1) the volume in gallons of eligible biofuel blend sold during the calendar year; new text end new text begin (2) copies of fuel sales records; and new text end new text begin (3) any additional information required by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Verification. new text end new text begin The commissioner must verify reported sales volumes against fuel sales reports submitted to the Department of Commerce pursuant to section 239.791, subdivision 8. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Payments. new text end new text begin The commissioner must make payments on a first-come, first-served basis within the limits of available funding. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Rulemaking. new text end new text begin The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this section. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; BIOFUEL SALES VOLUME INCENTIVE PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture to administer the biofuel sales volume incentive program in Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.115. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2032. new text end